California, session 20252026, AB655.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 99522 of the Government Code is amended to read:99522. (a) The California-Mexico Border Relations Council is hereby established in state government.(b) The council shall consist of eight voting members as follows:(1) The Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.(2) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.(3) The Secretary for Environmental Protection.(4) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services.(5) The Secretary of Transportation.(6) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture.(7) The Secretary of Business, Consumer Services, and Housing.(8) The Director of Emergency Services.(c) The Regional Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, Region 9, may appoint a representative from their staff to serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the council.(d) The Speaker of the Assembly may appoint a Member of the Assembly and the President pro Tempore may appoint a Member of the Senate who each represent a district that shares a border with Mexico to serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the council. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the Assembly or the President pro Tempore, as applicable, and participate in the activities of the council to the extent that their participation is not incompatible with their respective position as a Member of the Legislature. (e) The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall chair the council.